Missouri, session 2026, HB1747.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 537, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 537.041, to read as follows:
537.041. 1. As used in this section, "artificial intelligence" has the same meaning
as in 15 U.S.C. Section 9401(3).
2. Any image, video, or audio that is generated or modified using artificial
intelligence may contain a mark or statement that is visible or audible to users that the
image, video, or audio is generated or modified using artificial intelligence. Such mark
or statement shall be developed by the secretary of state, and such mark or statement
may be used by all persons or entities publishing or disseminating any image, video, or
audio generated or modified using artificial intelligence.
3. If a publisher or disseminator of an image, video, or audio that is generated or
modified using artificial intelligence does not place a mark or statement on such image,
video, or audio indicating that the image, video, or audio was generated or modified
using artificial intelligence and a person suffers an injury as a result of such image,
video, or audio, the injured person shall have standing to bring a cause of action against
the publisher or disseminator of the image, video, or audio for damages.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any image, video, or audio that
was generated or modified using artificial intelligence prior to August 28, 2026.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.